Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-101
University of Nebraska; establishment; name.

There has been established and shall be maintained in this state an institution under the name and style of the University of Nebraska.

Laws 1869, § 1, p. 172;

R.S.1913, § 7081;

C.S.1922, § 6713;

C.S.1929, § 85-101;

R.S.1943, § 85-101.

University of Nebraska was created as a body corporate, and its general government vested in a Board of Regents. State ex rel. Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska v. Moore, 46 Neb. 373, 64 N.W. 975 (1895).